Massachusetts, session 194th, H2761.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Definitions
As used in this act, the following words shall have the following meanings unless the
context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Regulatory Agency" means any department, commission, board, council, authority,
or other agency of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts that has regulatory, licensing, or
oversight responsibilities over any industry, business, or profession.
(b) "Regulated Industry" means any business, corporation, or entity subject to regulation,
oversight, or licensing by a regulatory agency of the Commonwealth.
(c) "Cooling-Off Period" means the period during which a former employee of a
regulatory agency is prohibited from employment, consulting, or engaging in any contractual
relationship with a regulated industry or any of its affiliates.
of 3

Section 2. Cooling-Off Period
(a) A former employee of any regulatory agency in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts
shall be prohibited from:
(1) Accepting employment with,
(2) Becoming a consultant for,
(3) Providing services to, or
(4) Entering into any contractual agreement with
any entity within a regulated industry that was under the oversight, regulation, or
licensing of the agency where the individual was employed for a period of five (5) years after the
termination of their state employment.
(b) This prohibition extends to any subsidiary, parent company, or affiliate of the
regulated entity where a direct or indirect influence over regulatory matters could be perceived.
Section 3. Exceptions
Exceptions to the cooling-off period may be granted by the State Ethics Commission only
under the following conditions:
(a) The employment or contract does not involve matters directly related to the duties or
responsibilities of the regulatory agency the individual previously served in.
(b) The individual can demonstrate that the proposed employment or contract would not
result in any conflict of interest, undue influence, or appearance of impropriety.
of 3

Such exceptions shall require a written application and approval by the State Ethics
Commission.
Section 4. Enforcement
(a) The State Ethics Commission shall have the authority to investigate violations of this
act, impose fines, and seek remedies including but not limited to:
(1) Civil penalties not to exceed $50,000 for each violation.
(2) Injunctions to prevent employment or contracts in violation of this act.
(3) Mandatory divestiture of any financial benefit gained through violation of this act.
(b) Any employment or contract entered into in violation of this act shall be voidable at
the option of the Commonwealth.
Section 5. Reporting Requirement
All regulatory agencies must submit an annual report to the State Ethics Commission
detailing:
(a) The names and positions of employees who have left the agency within the last year.
(b) The names of any regulated entities where these former employees have sought or
accepted employment or contracts within the five-year cooling-off period.
of 3